Connecticut, session 2026, SB00041.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That chapter 229 of the general statutes be amended to establish a
personal income tax deduction, for taxpayers sixty-five years of age or
older, for the amount of any capital gain on the sale of a primary home
that is includable in gross income for federal income tax purposes.